Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1405
Commission; membership; terms.

The commission shall consist of eleven members who shall be appointed by the Governor with the approval of a majority of the Legislature. One member shall be chosen from each of the six Supreme Court judicial districts. Five members shall be chosen on a statewide basis. The term of each member shall be six years or until a successor is qualified and takes office, except that of the members initially appointed, two statewide members and the members appointed from districts 1 and 2 shall serve for terms of two years and two statewide members and the members appointed from districts 3 and 4 shall serve for terms of four years. Members shall be residents of the state or district from which appointed, and no member or any member of his or her immediate family shall be employed by or be a member of a governing board or of a governing body of an independent or private university or college.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 16.